Georgia, session 2025_26, HB829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elementary and
secondary education, is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-149, relating to programs
for educating students regarding online internet safety, as follows:
"20-2-149.
(a)(1) The Department of Education shall develop model programs for educating
students regarding online safety while using the internet, taking into consideration
educational materials on this topic developed by other states as well as any other
H. B. 829
- 1 -

LC 59 0134
materials suggested by education experts, child psychologists, and technology companies
that promote child online safety issues.
(2) The model programs provided for in this subsection shall include one or more model
programs for students in grades six through 12 which:
(A) Shall include instruction regarding:
(i) The social, emotional, and physical effects of social media on users;
(ii) The effects of social media on the mental health of users, particularly teenagers;
(iii) The distribution of disinformation and misinformation on social media;
(iv) How social media influences thoughts and behaviors;
(v) The permanency and risks of sharing materials online;
(vi) The dangers of viewing material harmful to minors;
(vii) Age verification procedures on websites and social media;
(viii) How to maintain personal security and identify cyberbullying, predatory
behavior, and human trafficking on the internet and social media; and
(vii)(ix) How to report suspicious behavior encountered on the internet and social
media to appropriate persons and authorities; and
(B) May include information regarding the benefits of social media use, such as
supporting career readiness for future academic or employment opportunities, sharing
information with familiar family and friends, and safely connecting with other users
with similar interests.
(3) The Department of Education shall periodically update the model programs provided
for in this subsection to reflect changes in internet and social media use, emergent
technologies, social and psychological research, and information concerning new threats
to teenagers and young adults using social media platforms and other online
communication technologies.
(4) The Department of Education shall publish on its website information relating to the
model programs provided for in this Code section, including recommended curricula and
H. B. 829
- 2 -

LC 59 0134
instructional materials as updated periodically as provided in this subsection, along with
guidance relating to best practices for secure browsing and parental controls. The
Department of Education shall provide technical assistance in addition to such model
programs and recommended curricula and instructional materials to aid any local board
of education that may elect to incorporate one or more components of internet and social
media safety into its instructional program.
(5) The Department of Education shall evaluate the report published by the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 39-5-5 in assessing the reach and
impact of online safety education efforts.
(b) Each local board of education may incorporate into its instructional program a
component on online internet safety, including social media safety, to be taught on a
schedule as determined by the local board of education."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 5 of Title 39 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to online internet
safety, is amended by adding a new subsection to Code Section 39-5-5, relating to
commercial entity age verification, access to material harmful to minors, data retention,
penalties, and exclusions, to read as follows:
"(g) The Attorney General shall publish an annual report documenting enforcement actions
taken under this Code section."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 829
- 3 -